New Jersey, session 222, A3841.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services 2541 Division of State Library GRANTS-IN-AID 51-2541  Library Services ...................................................... $500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Division of State Library .................................... $500,000 Grants-in-Aid: 51    Main Library Alliance ............................. ($500,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.